Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-412
Member, defined.

Member shall mean a person who is recognized and acknowledged by a licensed organization as a member for purposes other than conducting activities under the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act. Member shall not include social or honorary members.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 133.